Mississippi, session 2026, HB981.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The physician, advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant primarily responsible for attending to the care of the decedent before the death of the decedent shall certify to the cause of death and sign the death certificate if the death does not affect the public interest as defined in Sections 41-61-53(e) and 41-61-59. SECTION 2.  Section 41-57-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-57-13.  (1)  Death certificate errors in the recording of personal information of the deceased may be corrected by affidavit of the informant and the funeral director of the funeral home that disposed of the body.  Items in the medical certification or of a medical nature may be amended upon receipt of the specified amendment form from (a) the person originally certifying the information or, if deceased or incapacitated, from the person responsible for the completion of such items, or (b) the State Medical Examiner.  All other amendments to a death certificate require adjudication by a chancery court in the county of residence of the complainant or in any chancery court district in the state if the complainant is a nonresident.  In all such proceedings, the State Department of Health, the State Medical Examiner and the county medical examiner or county medical examiner investigator who certified the information shall be made defendants. No death certificate shall be changed or amended by the State Medical Examiner or any county medical examiner or county medical examiner investigator after he has resigned or been removed from his office as the State Medical Examiner, county medical examiner or county medical examiner investigator. (2)  The local registrar of births and deaths in each county in the state shall, at least monthly, supply the county registrar, the tax assessor and the chairman of the county election commission of each county a list of deaths in the counties of individuals of voting age who have not been previously listed.  Such lists shall include the following information for each deceased person:  full name (as recorded on the death certificate), social security number, date of death, sex, race, age and usual place of residence. (3)  No such payment as is provided for in Section 41-57-11 shall be made by the board of supervisors unless and until the local registrar shall certify that a list of all deaths of individuals of voting age has been filed with the county voting registrar, tax assessor and with the chairman of the county election commission of the last county of residence of the decedent in this state. (4)  In the event that the decedent is a female, who at the time of her death was between the ages of ten (10) and fifty (50) years old, the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistant, medical examiner, coroner or other official who certifies the decedent's cause of death shall indicate, where appropriately designated, on the death certificate whether (a) the decedent was pregnant at the time of her death; (b) the decedent had given birth within the preceding ninety (90) days; or (c) the decedent had a miscarriage within the preceding ninety (90) days. SECTION 3.  Section 41-61-63, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-61-63.  (1)  The State Medical Examiner shall: (a)  Provide assistance, consultation and training to county medical examiners, county medical examiner investigators and law enforcement officials. (b)  Keep complete records of all relevant information concerning deaths or crimes requiring investigation by the medical examiners. (c)  Promulgate rules and regulations regarding the manner and techniques to be employed while conducting autopsies; the nature, character and extent of investigations to be made into deaths affecting the public interest to allow a medical examiner to render a full and complete analysis and report; the format and matters to be contained in all reports rendered by the medical examiners; and all other things necessary to carry out the purposes of Sections 41-61-51 through 41-61-79. The State Medical Examiner shall make such amendments to these rules and regulations as may be necessary.  All medical examiners, coroners and law enforcement officers shall be subject to such rules. (d)  Cooperate with the crime detection and medical examiner laboratories authorized by Section 45-1-17, the University of Mississippi Medical Center, the Attorney General, law enforcement agencies, the courts and the State of Mississippi. (e)  Promulgate rules and regulations regarding the manner in which county medical examiner investigators are required to enter electronically the information for all deaths that occur in the investigator's county. (2)  In addition, the medical examiners shall: (a)  Upon receipt of notification of a death affecting the public interest, make inquiries regarding the cause and manner of death, reduce the findings to writing and promptly make a full report to the State Medical Examiner on forms prescribed for that purpose.  The medical examiner shall be authorized to inspect and copy the medical reports of the decedent whose death is under investigation.  However, the records copied shall be maintained as confidential so as to protect the doctor/patient privilege.  The medical examiners shall be authorized to request the issuance of subpoenas, through the proper court, for the attendance of persons and for the production of documents as may be required by their investigation. (b)  Complete the medical examiner's portion of the certificate of death within seventy-two (72) hours of assuming jurisdiction over a death, and forward the certificate to the funeral director or to the family.  The medical examiner's portion of the certificate of death shall include the decedent's name, the date and time of death, the cause of death and the certifier's signature.  If determination of the cause and/or manner of death are pending an autopsy or toxicological or other studies, these sections on the certificate may be marked "pending," with amendment and completion to follow the completion of the postmortem studies.  The State Medical Examiner shall be authorized to amend a death certificate; however, the State Medical Examiner is not authorized to change or amend any death certificate after he has resigned or been removed from his office as the State Medical Examiner.  Where an attending physician, advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant refuses to sign a certificate of death, or in case of any death, the State Medical Examiner or properly qualified designee may sign the death certificate. (c)  Cooperate with other agencies as provided for the State Medical Examiner in subsection (1)(d) of this section. (d)  In all investigations of deaths affecting the public interest where an autopsy will not be performed, obtain or attempt to obtain postmortem blood, urine and/or vitreous fluids. Medical examiners may also obtain rectal temperature measurements, known hair samples, radiographs, gunshot residue/wiping studies, fingerprints, palm prints and other noninvasive studies as the case warrants and/or as directed by the State Medical Examiner. Decisions shall be made in consultation with investigating law enforcement officials and/or the State Medical Examiner.  The cost of all studies not performed by the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory shall be borne by the county.  County medical examiner investigators shall be authorized to obtain these postmortem specimens themselves following successful completion of the death investigation training school. (e)  In all investigations of deaths occurring in the manner specified in subsection (2)(j) of Section 41-61-59, a death investigation shall be performed by the medical examiners in accordance with the child death investigation protocol established by the State Medical Examiner.  The results of the death investigation shall be reported to the State Medical Examiner on forms prescribed for that purpose by the State Medical Examiner and to appropriate authorities, including police and child protective services, within three (3) days of the conclusion of the death investigation. (f)  Electronically report all deaths, and all associated toxicology reports, that occur in the examiner's county to the State Medical Examiner in a manner prescribed by the State Medical Examiner. (3)  The medical examiner shall not use his position or authority to favor any particular funeral home or funeral homes. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.